Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 1 General Provisions
4-6-147. Confiscated cash fund.

There is established a separate department of correction confiscated cash fund.

All moneys collected as contraband from the inmate population at any of the facilities operated by or under the authority of the department of correction shall be paid over to the department of correction for deposit into the fund established by this section.

The purpose of the fund is to enhance the department's ability to combat drug trafficking in facilities operated by or under the authority of the department of correction through the use of accepted investigative techniques and interdiction efforts, including, but not limited to, the use of canine units. Any moneys within the fund shall be withdrawn or expended only for accepted drug trafficking investigative techniques and interdiction efforts, including, but not limited to, the purchasing, training and maintenance of the department's canine units. Accounting procedures for the financial administration of the funds shall be in keeping with those prescribed by the comptroller of the treasury.

Moneys retained in the confiscated cash fund shall be invested by the state treasurer under appropriate rules and regulations to the end that adequate funds will be available for the purposes of this section.

Revenue that is produced for the confiscated cash fund shall not revert to the state general fund and shall not be subject to impoundment or allotment reserve, but shall be managed on a revolving no-quarter basis.

Acts 2006, ch. 1007, § 1; 2007, ch. 34, § 1.

Cross-References. Training to respond to mentally ill persons, §38-8-119.

4-6-148. Temporary retention of disabled correctional officer or youth service worker.

Whenever a correctional officer or youth service worker is injured in the line of duty and such injury disables such person from performing such person's regular duties, whether such disability is temporary or permanent, it is lawful for the commissioner of correction, or the commissioner of children's services, as appropriate, in such commissioner's sound discretion and with the approval of the governor and the attorney general and reporter, to retain such injured disabled employee upon the regular payroll of the department of correction or the department of children's services, as appropriate, until the person's claim for compensation for such disability is determined by the division of claims and risk management.

Acts 1987, ch. 178, § 1; 1989, ch. 278, § 23; 1996, ch. 1079, § 16; T.C.A. §4-7-117; Acts 2017, ch. 271, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Former §4-7-117, concerning temporary retention of disabled correctional officer or youth service worker, was transferred to this section in 2011 by the code commission in 2011.

Cross-References. Youth services officer, §37-1-106.

4-6-149. Eligibility to receive credit towards receipt of occupational license for occupational, career, or technical training in schools or correctional institution.

Persons who receive certified occupational, career, or technical training in schools or correctional institutions pursuant to this chapter are eligible to receive equivalent credit towards the receipt of an occupational license relating to the training received.

The occupational, career, or technical training received pursuant to this chapter must be consistent with the requirements for licensure by licensing authorities in order for persons to be eligible for equivalent credit under subsection (a).

Any person aggrieved by the decision of a licensing authority concerning eligibility for equivalent credit under this section may appeal to the commissioner of commerce and insurance or the commissioner's designee for a determination of whether the training meets the requirements for licensure. An appeal under this subdivision (b)(2) must be conducted in the same manner as is provided in § 4-5-322, for a contested case hearing under the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in chapter 5 of this title.

The commissioner of commerce and insurance, in collaboration with the commissioner of correction and the various departments charged with supervision of licensing authorities shall promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of chapter 492 of the Public Acts of 2019. All rules must be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in chapter 5 of this title.

This section applies to all professions and occupations regulated under title 62.

Acts 2019, ch. 492, § 2.